Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB977.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 908(7) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended to read:<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 SECTION 1. SECTION 107(A) OF THE ACT OF JULY 31, 1968 (P.L.805, NO.247), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA MUNICIPALITIES PLANNING CODE, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:SECTION 107. DEFINITIONS.--(A) THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"RECORDING DEVICE," A PHOTOGRAPHIC OR VIDEO CAMERA, AUDIO OR VIDEO RECORDER OR OTHER DEVICE NOW EXISTING OR LATER DEVELOPED THAT MAY BE USED FOR RECORDING OR TRANSFERRING IMAGES, AUDIO, VIDEO OR ANY COMBINATION THEREOF.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 908(7) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:Section 908. Hearings.--The board shall conduct hearings and make decisions in accordance with the following requirements:* * *(7) The board or the hearing officer, as the case may be, shall either keep a stenographic record of the proceedings or an audio recording A RECORDING FROM A RECORDING DEVICE of sufficient quality to ensure accurate transcription if needed for appeal. The appearance fee for a stenographer or the cost of producing an audio A recording shall be shared equally by the applicant and the board. The cost of the original transcript shall be paid by the board if the transcript is ordered by the board or hearing officer or shall be paid by the person appealing from the decision of the board if such appeal is made, and in either event the cost of additional copies shall be paid by the person requesting such copy or copies. In other cases the party 20250HB0977PN1650 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requesting the original transcript shall bear the cost thereof.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0977PN1650 - 3 - <--1234